Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.160

General causes of challenge.

General causes of challenge are:

(1) A want of any of the qualifications prescribed for a juror, as set out in RCW 2.36.070.

(2) Unsoundness of mind, or such defect in the faculties of the mind, or organs of the body, as renders him or her incapable of performing the duties of a juror in any action.

[ 1992 c 93 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 203 s 2; Code 1881 s 210; 1877 p 44 s 214; 1869 p 52 s 214; RRS s 327.]

NOTES:

Qualifications of jurors: RCW 2.36.070.